Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.195

Rights and duties of warehouse operator—RCW 22.09.190 inapplicable to contracts with governmental agencies.

RCW 22.09.190 does not apply to contracts entered into with a governmental agency, state or federal, for the handling, conditioning, storage, or shipping of agricultural commodities.

[ 1983 c 305 s 36; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 24.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.